Utah statutes.
9-7-506.   Annual reports.
The library board of directors shall:
(1)  make an annual report to the county executive and county legislative body
on the condition and operation of the library, including a financial
statement; and
(2)  provide for the keeping of records required by the State Library Board in
its request for an annual report from the public libraries, and submit that
annual report to the State Library Board.
